gpos.foma
# Copyright (C) 2024  Mateo Cedillo <angelitomateocedillo@gmail.com>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Lesser General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define DefiniteArticle 
lo | la | los | las ; 

define IndefiniteArticle 
un | una | unos | unas ; 

define PersonalPronoun 
yo | tú | su | sus | vos | él | ella | nosotros | nosotras | usted | vuestro | vuestra | vuestros | ellos | ellas | le ; 

define PersonalReflexivePronoun 
me | se | te | os | nos | la | lo | las | los ; 

define DemonstrativePronoun 
ese | esa | este | esta | esos | esas | estos | estas | [en este] | [en esta] | [en estos] | [en estas] | [de este] | [de esta] | [de estos] | [de estas] | [de ese] | [de esa] | [de esos] | [de esas] | [en este] | [en esta] | [en estos] | [en estas] | aquel | aquella | aquellos | aquellas | [de aquel] | [de aquella] | [de aquellos] | [de aquellas] | [en aquel] | [en aquella] | [en aquellos] | [en aquellas] | que ; 

define PossessiveAdjective 
mi | mis | tu | tus | su | sus | nuestro | nuestra | nuestros | nuestras | vuestro | vuestra | vuestros | vuestras | [de él] | [de ella] | [de ellos] | [de ellas] | [en él] | [en ella] | [en ellos] | [en ellas] ; 

define Preposition 
de | [de los] | [de las] | [de un] | [de una] | [de unos] | [de unas] | en | no | nos | [en un] | [en una] | [en unos] | [en unas] | por | [para él] | [para ella] | [para ellos] | [para ellas] | desde | entre | sobre ; 

define UnstressedConjunction 
y | tu | sí | más | como ; 

define Conjunction 
[a pesar de] | todavía | [sin embargo] | asimismo | [por tanto] | porque | entonces | [pese a] | [a pesar] | caso | apenas | enquanto ; 

define Ser 
ser | soy | és | somos | sois | son | era | érase | éramos | érais | eran | fui | fuiste | fue | fuimos | fuistes | fueron | será | serás | serán | seremos | sereis | sería | serías | seríamos | seríais | serían ;

define Estar 
estar | estoy | estás | está | estamos | estáis | estado | estaba | estabas | estábamos | estaban | estuve | estuvo | estuvimos | estuvieran | estaré | estarás | estará | estaremos | estarán ; 

define Tener 
tener | tengo | tienes | tiene | tenemos | tiendes | tienen | tenía | tenías | teníamos | tenéis | tenían | tuve | tenido | tuvo | tuvimos | tuviste | tuvieran | tendré | tendrás | tendrá | tendremos | tendráis | tendrán | tendría | tendrías | tendríamos | tendrían ; 

define Hacer 
hazer | hago | haz | hacemos | hacen ; 

define Poder 
poder | puedo | puedes | puede | podemos | podéis | pueden | podía | podías | podíamos | podíais | podían | pude | pudo | pudimos | pudieran | podré | podrás | podrá | podremos | podreis | podrán | podría | podrías | podríamos | podrían ; 

define Ir 
ir | voy | vas | va | vamos | van | iba | ibas | íbamos | iban | iré | irás | irá | iremos | irán ; 

define Haber 
haber | oye | deberíamos | habrán | había | habían | havíamos | habré | habrá | habrás | habremos | habrán | habría | habríamos | habrían ; 

define AuxiliaryVerb 
Ser | Estar | Tener | Haber ; 

define WhWord 
qué | quién | quiénes | cuándo | donde | adonde | cuanto | cuanta | cuantos | cuantas | cuan | cual | cuales | como ; 

define FunctionWord 
DefiniteArticle | 
IndefiniteArticle | 
PersonalPronoun | 
PersonalReflexivePronoun | 
DemonstrativePronoun | 
PossessiveAdjective | 
Preposition | 
UnstressedConjunction | 
Conjunction | 
AuxiliaryVerb ; 

regex 
DefiniteArticle -> def ,, 
IndefiniteArticle -> indef ,, 
PersonalPronoun -> pp ,, 
PersonalReflexivePronoun -> prp ,, 
DemonstrativePronoun -> dp ,, 
PossessiveAdjective -> pos ,, 
[Preposition -nos] -> prep ,, 
[UnstressedConjunction - se] -> uconj ,, 
Conjunction -> conj ,, 
Ser -> cop ,, 
Estar -> cop ,, 
Tener -> aux ,, 
Haber -> aux ,, 
\FunctionWord -> content ; 
